Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1608
Regulated exchange; transitioning carrier; retail services.

In an exchange that remains regulated, a transitioning carrier shall price the carrier's retail services in accordance with the provisions that applied to that carrier immediately before the date the carrier was classified by the commission as a transitioning carrier.

Laws 2025, LB311, § 8.